Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4100.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 6d. The portion of highway M-50 in Monroe County beginning at the intersection with South Raisinville Road and extending east to the intersection with Herr Road shall be known as the âAnimal Control Officer Darrian Young Memorial Highwayâ. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor